src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON BADJOSAT   !!= * __@CODE@__ Pl. bajus:badjosat, short cmp-form
                               +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>X4X7                   flagON-R   ;
                               +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>X4                     flagOFF-R  ;
                               +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>X8                     flagON-R   ;
                               +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>                       flagOFF-R  ;
                                     +N+Ess:%>X4in                   K          ;
!                                 +N+Sg+Gen:%>a                      K          ;
!                                 +N+Sg+Gen:                         K          ; !SUB
!                                 +N+Sg+Gen:%>                       NPxC       ; !^P^
                                  +N+Pl+Nom:%>X2at                   K          ;
!                                 +N+Pl+Nom:%>X2ijddá%>              NPx1V      ;
                                  +N+Pl+Gen:%>X2ijd                  K          ;
                               +N+Cmp/PlGen:%>X2ijd                  R          ;
                                  +N+Pl+Acc:%>X2ijd                  K          ;
                                  +N+Pl+Ill:%>X2ijdda                K          ;
                                  +N+Pl+Loc:%>X2ijn                  K          ;
                         +N+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:%>X2ijnna                K          ;
                   +N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:%>X2ijs                  K          ; ! !SOUTH
                                  +N+Pl+Com:%>X2ijgujn               K          ;
                               +N+Pl+Com/Sh:%>X2ij%-                 ENDLEX     ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
                                  +N+Pl+Gen:%>X2ijddi%>              NPxVvowch  ;
                                  +N+Pl+Acc:%>X2ijddi%>              NPxVvowch  ;
                                  +N+Pl+Ill:%>X2ijddás%>             NPxC       ;
                                  +N+Pl+Loc:%>X2ijnni%>              NPxVvowch  ;
                                  +N+Pl+Com:%>X2ijddi%>              NPxPlComV1 ;
                    +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»X2ažža%>n               K          ;
                    +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Ess:»X2ažža%>n%>             NPxC       ;
                 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X2ažža%>X4t             K          ;
!       +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jd%>          NPx1C      ;
!                +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd%>    NPx1C      ;
        +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jd            K          ;
                 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd      K          ;
     +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jd            R          ;
              +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Cmp/PlGen:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd      R          ;
        +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jd%>          NPxC       ;
                 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Gen:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd%>    NPxC       ;
        +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jd            K          ;
                 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd      K          ;
        +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jd%>          NPxC       ;
                 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Acc:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd%>    NPxC       ;
        +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jde           K          ;
                 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjde     K          ;
        +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jdasa%>       NPxVvowch  ;
                 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Ill:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjdasa%> NPxVvowch  ;
        +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jn            K          ;
                 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjn      K          ;
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5js            K          ; ! !SOUTH
  +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+South+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjs      K          ; ! !SOUTH
        +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jn%>          NPxC       ;
                 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjn%>    NPxC       ;
        +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jgujn         K          ;
                 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjgujn   K          ;
     +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com/Sh+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5j%-           ENDLEX     ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
              +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com/Sh:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPj%-     ENDLEX     ; !guosai- ja beziiguin
        +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>X5jd%>          NPxPlComC  ;
                 +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjd%>    NPxPlComC  ;
        +N+Der1+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Com+Err/Orth:»X2ažža%>%^DISIMPjn%>    NPxPlComC  ;
            +N+Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Use/-PLX:»X4W4#heapmi%>           HEAPMI     ;
          +Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Use/-PLX+Ess:»X4W4#heapmi%>X1n        K          ;
          +Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Ess+Err/Orth:»X4W4#heapmi%>X7n        K          ;
          +Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Use/-PLX+Ess:»X4W4#heapmi%>X1n%>      NPxC       ;
          +Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Use/-PLX+Ess:»X4W4#heapmi%>X7n%>      NPxC       ;
            +N+Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Use/-PLX:»X4W4#his                ATTR       ;
!           +N+Der1+Der2+Der/Car+A+Use/-PLX:»X4W4#his                VUOHTA     ; !moved to LEXICON ATTR
                                +N+Use/-PLX:%>X8                     GEAHTES    ;
