src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON HyphNouns
Guhkesnjárgga% márkanat+CmpN/First:Guhkes^njárgga% márkan BADJOSAT ;
Johkamohke% márkanat+CmpN/First:Johkamohke% márkan BADJOSAT ;
Johkamohki% márkanat+CmpN/First:Johkamohki% márkan BADJOSAT ;
Johkamohkke-márkanat+CmpN/First:Johkamohkke-márkan BADJOSAT ;
Johkamohkki-márkanat+CmpN/First:Johkamohkki-márkan BADJOSAT ;
TV2-ođđasat+CmpN/First+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:TV2-ođđas BADJOSAT ;
tv-ođđasat+CmpN/First+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:tv-ođđas BADJOSAT ;
TV-ođđasat+CmpN/First+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:TV-ođđas BADJOSAT ;
LEXICON Noun
badjosat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Use/Sub:badjus BADJOSAT ;
bassimállásat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen+Event:bassi#mállis BADJOSAT ;
beassášmállásat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen+Event:beassáš#mállis BADJOSAT ;
birasođđasat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:biras#ođđas BADJOSAT ;
boazodoalloođđasat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:boazo#doallo#ođđas BADJOSAT ;
bádjasat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen+CmpN/Last:bád'jas BADJOSAT ;
dearvvuohtamállásat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:dearvvuohta#mállis BADJOSAT ;
doallobiergasat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:doallo#bier'gas BADJOSAT ;
doallomállásat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen+Event:doallo#mállis BADJOSAT ;
dállodoallobiergasat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:dállo#doallo#bier'gas BADJOSAT ;
eahkedismállásat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen+Event:eahkedis#mállis BADJOSAT ;
eahkesmállásat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen+Event:eahkes#mállis BADJOSAT ;
eahketmállásat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen+Event:eahket#mállis BADJOSAT ;
eatnehat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:eatneh BADJOSAT ; !Turi, muitalus...
feastamállásat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen+Event:feasta#mállis BADJOSAT ;
gaskabeaimállásat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen+Event:gaska#beai#mállis BADJOSAT ;
gaskabeaivvemállásat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen+Event:gaska#beaivve#mállis BADJOSAT ;
gaskavuoigŋašat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:gaska#vuojgŋaš BADJOSAT ;
neahttaođđasat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:neahtta#ođđas BADJOSAT ;
gimbalat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:gim'bal BADJOSAT ;
guovdavuoigŋašat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:guovda#vuojgŋaš BADJOSAT ;
gádjunávdnasat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:gádjun#ávdnas BADJOSAT ;
gávdnasat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:gávdnas BADJOSAT ;
headjamállásat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen+Event:headja#mállis BADJOSAT ;
hearrámállásat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen+Event:hearrá#mállis BADJOSAT ;
heastabiergasat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:heasta#bier'gas BADJOSAT ;
huksenávdnasat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:huksen#ávdnas BADJOSAT ;
idjagerbmosat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:idja#gearbmus BADJOSAT ;
ivdnebiktasat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:ivdne#bik'tas BADJOSAT ;
iđitođđasat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:iđit#ođđas BADJOSAT ; !(pl.)
iđđedisođđasat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:iđđedis#ođđas BADJOSAT ; !(pl.)
iđđesođđasat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:iđđes#ođđas BADJOSAT ; !(pl.)
juovlamállásat+Event:juovla#mállis BADJOSAT ;
kalohttaođđasat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:kalohtta#ođđas BADJOSAT ;
keavlabiktasat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:keavla#bik'tas BADJOSAT ;
kompostagávgasat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:komposta#gáv'gas BADJOSAT ;
interneahttaođđasat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:interneahtta#ođđas BADJOSAT ;
luvvenávdnasat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:luvven#ávdnas BADJOSAT ;
láhppasat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:láhppas BADJOSAT ;
mihcamársuovvasat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:mihcamár#suovvas BADJOSAT ;
mihcamarsuovvasat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:mihcamar#suovvas BADJOSAT ;
mállásat+Event:mállis BADJOSAT ;
oktasašoahppoávdnasat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:oktasaš#oahppo#ávdnas BADJOSAT ;
ovdavuoigŋašat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:ovda#vuojgŋaš BADJOSAT ;
riepmomállásat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen+Event:riepmo#mállis BADJOSAT ;
ráđđasat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:ráđđas BADJOSAT ;
skuvlaváibasat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:skuvla#váj'bas BADJOSAT ;
spirralat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen+Body:spirral BADJOSAT ;
stuoravuoigŋašat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:stuora#vuojgŋaš BADJOSAT ;
stuorravuoigŋašat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:stuorra#vuojgŋaš BADJOSAT ;
suodjalanávdnasat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:suodjalan#ávdnas BADJOSAT ;
sáhppasat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:sáhppas BADJOSAT ;
guossemállásat+Event:guosse#mállis BADJOSAT ;
sámemállásat+Event:sáme#mállis BADJOSAT ;
unnavuoigŋašat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:unna#vuojgŋaš BADJOSAT ;
vuoigŋašat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:vuojgŋaš BADJOSAT ;
váibasat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:váj'bas BADJOSAT ;
váibmoovdasat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:váibmo#ov'das BADJOSAT ;
várjalanávdnasat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:várjalan#ávdnas BADJOSAT ;
árbmomállásat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen+Event:árbmo#mállis BADJOSAT ;
čakčamárkanat:čakča#márkan BADJOSAT ;
rádioođđasat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:rádio#ođđas BADJOSAT ;
sámegielođđasat+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/DefPlGen:sáme#giel#ođđas BADJOSAT ;
